Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6086.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The time within which The Kane-Barrengos Foundation, incorporated on
July 16, 1969, shall file the reports for the years 1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005,
2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021,
2022, 2023 ,2024, and 2025 as required under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 7 of the General
Laws, 1956, is hereby extended to the 31st day of December, A.D., 2025, if said corporation shall
file in the office of the secretary of state before December 31, 2025, the reports which it should
have filed in the said years and shall pay to the secretary of state the filing fees therefor, having
previously thereto paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state such sum as the attorney
general shall decide should be paid by said corporation as a compromise for the penalty or penalties
for its failure to file such reports then the forfeiture or revocation of the charter of said corporation
shall thereupon, to wit, upon the filing of said reports and the payment of said fees, be vacated and
said corporation shall thereupon be entitled to all of the privileges, benefits and powers and subject
to the same duties and liabilities as though no forfeiture or revocation of its said charter had taken
place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002353
========